Florida, session 2026, HB63.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (12) of section
790.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
790.06 License to carry concealed weapon or concealed
firearm.—
(12)(a) A license issued under This section does not
authorize any person to openly carry a handgun, or carry a
concealed weapon, or concealed firearm into:
1. Any place of nuisance as defined in s. 823.05;
2. Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol station;
3. Any detention facility, prison, or jail;
4. Any courthouse;
5. Any courtroom, except that nothing in this section
precludes a judge from carrying a concealed weapon or concealed
firearm or determining who will carry a concealed weapon or
concealed firearm in his or her courtroom;
6. Any polling place;
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb63-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 63 2026
7. Any meeting of the governing body of a county, public
school district, municipality, or special district;
8. Any meeting of the Legislature or a committee thereof;
9. Any school, college, or professional athletic event not
related to firearms;
10. Any elementary or secondary school facility or
administration building;
11. Any career center;
12. Any portion of an establishment licensed to dispense
alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, which
portion of the establishment is primarily devoted to such
purpose;
13. Any college or university facility unless the licensee
is a registered student, employee, or faculty member of such
college or university and the weapon is a stun gun or nonlethal
electric weapon or device designed solely for defensive purposes
and the weapon does not fire a dart or projectile;
14. The inside of the passenger terminal and sterile area
of any airport, provided that no person shall be prohibited from
carrying any legal firearm into the terminal, which firearm is
encased for shipment for purposes of checking such firearm as
baggage to be lawfully transported on any aircraft; or
15. Any place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited
by federal law.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb63-00